Arkansas, session 2025, SB81.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - State Parks and Tourism
Divisions for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U068U ADPHT PARKS DIVISION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE01
(2) U067U ADPHT TOURISM DIVISION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE01
(3) N223N ADPHT PARKS DIV DEPUTY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS14
(4) S001C ADPHT PARKS OPERATIONS MGR 1 GRADE GS12
*WFP012*
01/17/2025 3:35:03 PM WFP012

SB81
(5) G037C ADPHT PARKS PLANNING & DEV MGR 1 GRADE GS12
(6) B015C ENGINEER SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS12
(7) B020C ADPHT REGIONAL PARK SUPERVISOR 5 GRADE GS11
(8) B023C ENGINEER, P.E. 1 GRADE GS11
(9) G076C ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES MANAGER 2 GRADE GS10
(10) A036C ADPHT REVENUE OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(11) T116C EMERGENCY SERVICES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(12) B027C PARK SUPERINTENDENT V 5 GRADE GS10
(13) G078C ADPHT PROGRAM SERVICES ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS09
(14) C100C ADPHT RESEARCH PROJECT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS09
(15) B042C ENGINEER 1 GRADE GS09
(16) B021C LICENSED ARCHITECT 1 GRADE GS09
(17) G095C LODGE MANAGER 3 GRADE GS09
(18) B031C PARK SUPERINTENDENT IV 14 GRADE GS09
(19) T042C ADPHT CHIEF RANGER 1 GRADE GS08
(20) G105C ADPHT DEVELOPMENT MANAGER 2 GRADE GS08
(21) C101C ADPHT WELCOME CENTER ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(22) B032C CHIEF PARK PLANNER 1 GRADE GS08
(23) P010C EXHIBITS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(24) S003C FOOD & BEVERAGE DIRECTOR 2 GRADE GS08
(25) S004C MAINTENANCE MANAGER 3 GRADE GS08
(26) G079C OUTDOOR REC GRANTS PRGM DIR 1 GRADE GS08
(27) B048C PARK SUPERINTENDENT III 24 GRADE GS08
(28) G165C ADPHT SPECIALTY OPERATIONS MANAGER 3 GRADE GS07
(29) S015C ASST LODGE MANAGER 3 GRADE GS07
(30) P016C CURATOR 4 GRADE GS07
(31) S017C MAINTENANCE COORDINATOR 4 GRADE GS07
(32) P030C MUSEUM EXHIBIT PROGRAM SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS07
(33) B075C PARK PLANNER 7 GRADE GS07
(34) B071C PARK SUPERINTENDENT II 30 GRADE GS07
(35) P020C PRODUCTION ARTIST 2 GRADE GS07
(36) P068C RADIO PRODUCER 1 GRADE GS07
(37) X077C REAL ESTATE OFFICER 1 GRADE GS07
(38) C003C STADIUM COMMISSION MARKETING/EVENT MGR 1 GRADE GS07
(39) P025C SUPERVISOR OF INTERPRETIVE PROGRAMS 1 GRADE GS07
(40) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
01/17/2025 3:35:03 PM WFP012

SB81
(41) P034C ADPHT CONSULTANT 2 GRADE GS06
(42) P041C COMMERCIAL GRAPHIC ARTIST 1 GRADE GS06
(43) A074C FISCAL SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS06
(44) P049C GRAPHIC ARTIST 1 GRADE GS06
(45) P040C HISTORICAL RESEARCHER 1 GRADE GS06
(46) G206C LODGE SALES DIRECTOR 6 GRADE GS06
(47) S033C MAINTENANCE SUPERVISOR 9 GRADE GS06
(48) P028C PARK INTERPRETER II 13 GRADE GS06
(49) G205C PARK PROGRAM SPECIALIST 4 GRADE GS06
(50) T056C PARK RANGER II 20 GRADE GS06
(51) B085C PARK SUPERINTENDENT I 12 GRADE GS06
(52) B076C RESEARCH PROJECT ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
(53) S014C RESTAURANT MANAGER 5 GRADE GS06
(54) S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPERVISOR 7 GRADE GS06
(55) C036C ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
(56) C096C ADPHT OFFICE MANAGER III 7 GRADE GS05
(57) C027C ADPHT WELCOME CENTER MANAGER II 7 GRADE GS05
(58) S048C ASST RESTAURANT MANAGER 5 GRADE GS05
(59) X129C CONSTRUCTION INSPECTOR 3 GRADE GS05
(60) B090C ENGINEER TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE GS05
(61) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
(62) C047C FRONT DESK SUPERVISOR 3 GRADE GS05
(63) S049C LODGE HOUSEKEEPING SUPERVISOR 4 GRADE GS05
(64) P035C PARK INTERPRETER 29 GRADE GS05
(65) T063C PARK RANGER 5 GRADE GS05
(66) S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 19 GRADE GS05
(67) C008C STADIUM COMMISSION OFFICE MANAGER 1 GRADE GS05
(68) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 9 GRADE GS04
(69) S104C ADPHT HOUSEKEEPER SUPERVISOR 11 GRADE GS04
(70) C039C ADPHT OFFICE MANAGER II 41 GRADE GS04
(71) C091C ADPHT WELCOME CENTER MANAGER I 7 GRADE GS04
(72) T079C FACILITY MANAGER II 17 GRADE GS04
(73) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
(74) A102C FISCAL SUPPORT TECHNICIAN 8 GRADE GS04
(75) S044C FOOD PREPARATION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS04
(76) S052C HEAVY EQUIPMENT SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS04
01/17/2025 3:35:03 PM WFP012

SB81
(77) R036C HUMAN RESOURCES SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS04
(78) S047C LANDSCAPE SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS04
(79) S046C MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN 57 GRADE GS04
(80) C043C RECORDS MANAGEMENT ANALYST 1 GRADE GS04
(81) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 13 GRADE GS03
(82) S103C ADPHT HOUSEKEEPER 15 GRADE GS03
(83) C067C ADPHT WELCOME CENTER ASSISTANT MANAGER 13 GRADE GS03
(84) P054C ASST LODGE SALES DIRECTOR 3 GRADE GS03
(85) S058C EQUIPMENT MECHANIC 1 GRADE GS03
(86) T085C FACILITY MANAGER I 27 GRADE GS03
(87) S056C FOOD PREPARATION SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS03
(88) S057C LANDSCAPE SPECIALIST 5 GRADE GS03
(89) S059C LODGE COOK 18 GRADE GS03
(90) S050C MAINTENANCE SPECIALIST 52 GRADE GS03
(91) P056C MUSEUM PROGRAM ASSISTANT II 2 GRADE GS03
(92) S054C PRINTER 1 GRADE GS03
(93) C068C RETAIL SPECIALIST 5 GRADE GS03
(94) T087C SECURITY OFFICER 1 GRADE GS03
(95) C086C DESK CLERK 25 GRADE GS02
(96) S068C FOOD PREPARATION COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS02
(97) S085C FOOD PREPARATION SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS02
(98) S066C LANDSCAPE TECHNICIAN 5 GRADE GS02
(99) P064C MUSEUM PROGRAM ASSISTANT I 4 GRADE GS02
(100) P055C SPECIAL EVENTS SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS02
(101) P061C TRAVEL CONSULTANT 19 GRADE GS02
(102) S089C FOOD PREPARATION TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE GS01
(103) S065C MAINTENANCE ASSISTANT 29 GRADE GS01
(104) S090C WAITRESS/WAITER 12 GRADE GS01
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 726

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP. There is hereby authorized, for the Department
of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - State Parks and Tourism Divisions for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: eight hundred seven (807) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
01/17/2025 3:35:03 PM WFP012

SB81
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, to be
payable from the Parks and Tourism Fund Account, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - State
Parks and Tourism Divisions - State Operations for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $12,569,422
(02) EXTRA HELP 2,500
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 5,483,877
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 0
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) TOURISM/MUSEUM GRANTS 30,000
(06) CONFERENCE-DAC 100
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $18,085,899

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - RETIREMENT AND RELOCATION PROMOTION PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks, Heritage, and
Tourism, to be payable from the Tourism Development Trust Fund, for operating
and advertising expenses of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism -
State Parks and Tourism Divisions - Retirement and Relocation Promotion
Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $60,000
01/17/2025 3:35:03 PM WFP012

SB81
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 10,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) ADVERTISING EXPENSE 898,619
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $968,619

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - CONSERVATION TAX OPERATIONS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, to be
payable from the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism Fund Account,
from proceeds derived from the Conservation Tax levied by Amendment 75 of the
Constitution of the State of Arkansas, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - State Parks and
Tourism Divisions - Conservation Tax Operations for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $7,699,677
(02) EXTRA HELP 2,134,077
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 3,357,472
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 16,394,284
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 613,894
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 3,500,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) CONSTRUCTION 45,874,272
(06) SPECIAL MAINTENANCE 4,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $83,573,676

SECTION 6. REGULAR SALARIES - KEEP ARKANSAS BEAUTIFUL - CONSERVATION
TAX OPERATIONS. There is hereby established for the Department of Parks,
Heritage, and Tourism - State Parks and Tourism Divisions - Keep Arkansas
Beautiful - Conservation Tax Operations for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.
01/17/2025 3:35:03 PM WFP012

SB81

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) G167C KEEP ARKANSAS BEAUTIFUL DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS09
(2) G176C VOLUNTEER PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
(3) S050C MAINTENANCE SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 3

SECTION 7. EXTRA HELP - KEEP ARKANSAS BEAUTIFUL - CONSERVATION TAX
OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for the Department of Parks,
Heritage, and Tourism - State Parks and Tourism Divisions - Keep Arkansas
Beautiful - Conservation Tax Operations for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: one
(1) temporary or part-time employee, when needed, at rates of pay not to
exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or
its successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - KEEP ARKANSAS BEAUTIFUL - CONSERVATION TAX
OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks,
Heritage, and Tourism, to be payable from the Keep Arkansas Beautiful Fund
Account, from proceeds derived from the Conservation Tax levied by Amendment
75 of the Constitution of the State of Arkansas, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - State
Parks and Tourism Divisions - Keep Arkansas Beautiful - Conservation Tax
Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $138,924
(02) EXTRA HELP 6,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 55,401
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 88,937
01/17/2025 3:35:03 PM WFP012

SB81
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 5,000
(C) PROF. FEES 125,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) KAB GRANTS 40,000
(06) ADVERTISING EXPENSE 600,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,059,262

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - MUSEUM OF NATURAL RESOURCES - SPECIAL
REVENUE FUND OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, to be payable from the Arkansas Museum of
Natural Resources Fund, for personal services of the Department of Parks,
Heritage, and Tourism - State Parks and Tourism Divisions - Museum of Natural
Resources - Special Revenue Fund Operations for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $76,932
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 33,736
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $110,668

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - TOURISM PROMOTION - SPECIAL REVENUE FUND
OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks,
Heritage, and Tourism, to be payable from the Tourism Development Trust Fund,
for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Parks,
Heritage, and Tourism - State Parks and Tourism Divisions - Tourism Promotion
- Special Revenue Fund Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $283,677
(02) EXTRA HELP 27,502
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 123,625
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
01/17/2025 3:35:03 PM WFP012

SB81
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 3,222,977
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 41,570
(C) PROF. FEES 2,246,280
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 125,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) TOURIST PROMOTION 2,922,000
(06) ADVERTISING EXPENSE 24,260,050
(07) SMALL FESTIVAL EXPENSES, ADVERTISING
& GRANTS 150,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $33,402,681

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - OUTDOOR RECREATION GRANTS PROGRAM. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, to
be payable from the Parks and Tourism Outdoor Recreation Grants Fund, for
personal services, operating expenses, and outdoor recreation grants of the
Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - State Parks and Tourism
Divisions - Outdoor Recreation Grants Program for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $166,707
(02) EXTRA HELP 25,210
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 72,789
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 37,020
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 5,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) OUTDOOR RECREATION GRANTS 9,716,374
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $10,023,100

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - SCORP PROGRAM - FEDERAL FUND OPERATIONS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks, Heritage, and
Tourism, to be payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief
01/17/2025 3:35:03 PM WFP012

SB81
Fiscal Officer of the State, for operating expenses and outdoor recreation
grants of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - State Parks and
Tourism Divisions - Statewide Comprehensive Outdoor Recreation Plan for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $34,232
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 6,100
(C) PROF. FEES 100,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) OUTDOOR RECREATION GRANTS 8,308,402
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $8,448,734

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - PARKS - CASH FUND OPERATIONS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, to be
payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - State Parks and
Tourism Divisions - Parks - Cash Fund Operations for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $9,762,112
(02) EXTRA HELP 6,565,923
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 4,518,730
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 11,566,526
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 34,000
(C) PROF. FEES 2,000,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 500,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) CONSTRUCTION 500,000
01/17/2025 3:35:03 PM WFP012

SB81
(06) RESALE (COGS) 5,564,961
(07) DEBT SERVICE 0
(08) CONTRACTUAL SERVICES 486,177
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $41,498,429

SECTION 14. APPROPRIATION - WAR MEMORIAL STADIUM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, to be
payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal services,
operating expenses, major maintenance, renovation of facilities and
scoreboards, and repairs of War Memorial Stadium of the Department of Parks,
Heritage, and Tourism - State Parks and Tourism Divisions for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $304,119
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 118,893
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 12,198
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $435,210

SECTION 15. EXTRA HELP - WAR MEMORIAL STADIUM - CASH FUND OPERATIONS.
There is hereby authorized, for the Department of Parks, Heritage, and
Tourism - State Parks and Tourism Divisions - War Memorial Stadium - Cash
Fund Operations for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number
of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable
from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: one hundred forty-four
(144) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to
exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or
its successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 16. APPROPRIATION - WAR MEMORIAL STADIUM - CASH FUND
01/17/2025 3:35:03 PM WFP012

SB81
OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks,
Heritage, and Tourism, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the
State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Parks,
Heritage, and Tourism - State Parks and Tourism Divisions - War Memorial
Stadium - Cash Fund Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $82,348
(02) EXTRA HELP 144,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 47,715
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 921,088
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) RESALE (COGS) 213,000
(06) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 100,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,508,151

SECTION 17. APPROPRIATION - DELTA HERITAGE TRAIL CONSTRUCTION PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks, Heritage, and
Tourism, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for operating expenses
of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - State Parks and Tourism
Divisions - Delta Heritage Trail Construction Program for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CONSTRUCTION $37,880,862

SECTION 18. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
01/17/2025 3:35:03 PM WFP012

SB81
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. SPECIAL
MAINTENANCE. The funds appropriated in the Conservation Tax Operations
appropriation section of this act for the Division of Arkansas State Parks
Special Maintenance shall be expended, after receiving prior approval by the
Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee, for a special
maintenance program for the Park System. The funds provided will be used for
repair and upkeep of parks and museum facilities that have been deferred due
to lack of funds in the individual budgets of the parks and museums.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly
has determined that the Division of Arkansas State Parks may operate more
efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the Department of Parks,
Heritage, and Tourism authorizing broad powers under this section. Therefore,
it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain
oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by
the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of
this section or the Special Maintenance line item. If the requirement of
approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled
unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section
and the Special Maintenance line item in the Conservation Tax Operations
appropriation section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 19. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. CASH
PRIZES - STATE PARKS. The Division of Arkansas State Parks is hereby
authorized to award merchandise, gift certificates, and cash prizes to
contestants in various special events authorized by the Division Director of
the Division of Arkansas State Parks. Such prizes may be awarded to the 1st,
2nd, and 3rd prize winners and shall be payable from the maintenance and
01/17/2025 3:35:03 PM WFP012

SB81
operation line item of the Parks - Cash Fund Operations appropriation
section. The cash prizes, in aggregate, for all contests, shall not exceed
$10,000 per fiscal year.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 20. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
MISSISSIPPI RIVER DOMESTIC - INTERNATIONAL MARKETING PLAN. Of the funds
appropriated to the Division of Arkansas Tourism - Great River Road for
operating expenses in the State Operations appropriation section of this act,
up to $15,000 each year is authorized to be utilized for the implementation
of the Mississippi River Domestic - International Marketing Plan.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 21. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. SMALL
FESTIVAL FUNDING. The General Assembly acknowledges the economic benefits of
festivals which attract visitors and stimulate the growth of tourism and
businesses statewide.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law or rules and regulations
promulgated by the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism to the
contrary, the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism shall dedicate,
commit, and budget annually one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
from the 2% tourism tax credited to the Tourism Development Trust Fund for
expense, advertising, marketing, or grants for small festivals in Arkansas
communities of less than 10,500 people. Any funds not granted out in a
fiscal year shall be available for other tourism promotion efforts.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 22. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. EXTRA
HELP. The Department of Parks, Heritage and Tourism may utilize their
authorized extra-help positions and contract labor event staff up to a
01/17/2025 3:35:03 PM WFP012

SB81
maximum of one thousand eight hundred (1,800) hours during seasonal events at
War Memorial Stadium. The rates of pay may not exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification Act, or its successor, for the appropriate
classification.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 23. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
PROMOTIONAL AND EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS. The Division of Arkansas State Parks
and Tourism is hereby authorized to purchase from Maintenance and General
Operations appropriations provided by this Act, up to an amount not to exceed
$75,000 each fiscal year, promotional and educational merchandise, authorized
by the Secretary of the Department of Arkansas Parks, Heritage, and Tourism,
to inform the public of the Division's programs, to promote the functions of
the Division, and to inform the public regarding services provided by the
Division.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2025,
through June 30, 2026.

SECTION 24. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 25. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
01/17/2025 3:35:03 PM WFP012

SB81
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 26. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.






















01/17/2025 3:35:03 PM WFP012